North Dakota statutes. TITLE 60 Warehousing and Deposits
CHAPTER 60-03 Hay Buyers [Repealed]

60-03-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 60-0301; S.L. 1957, ch 371, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 60-0301; S.L. 1971, ch. 585, § 1; 1983, ch. 673, § 1; 1985, ch. 663, § 1; 1989, ch. 743, § 1; 1993, ch. 52, § 4; 1993, ch. 587, § 1; 1999, ch. 534, § 3; 2003, ch. 547, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-01.1.
Duties and powers of the commission. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 673, § 4; 1999, ch. 534, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-02.
License — How obtained — Fee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 60-0302; S.L. 1967, ch. 472, § 1; 1971, ch. 586, § 1; 1983, ch. 673, § 2; 1989, ch. 743, § 2; 1999, ch. 534, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-03.
Subject to public warehouse laws. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 534, § 16.

60-03-04.
Bond filing by hay buyer. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 60-0304; S.L. 1957, ch. 371, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 60-0304; S.L. 1967, ch. 472, § 2; 1971, ch. 585, § 2; 1983, ch. 673, § 5; 1989, ch. 743, § 3; 1999, ch. 534, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-04.1.
Credit-sale contract. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 673, § 6; 1989, ch. 743, § 4; 1999, ch. 534, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-05.
Hay buyer must carry license — Penalty for transacting business without license and giving a bond. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 60-0305; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 630; 1999, ch. 534, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-06.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 5; R.C. 1943, § 60-0306; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 631; 1983, ch. 673, § 7; 1989, ch. 743, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-07.
Commission makes rules and regulations governing roving grain or hay buyers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 673, § 10.

60-03-08.
Revocation and suspension. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 7; R.C. 1943, § 60-0308; S.L. 1983, ch. 673, § 8; 1999, ch. 534, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-09.
Procedure for revocation of license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1983, ch. 673, § 10.

60-03-09.1.
Complaint procedure. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 17.

60-03-10.
Records required to be kept by hay buyer — Reports. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 60-0310; 1999, ch. 534, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-11.
Hay buyer’s fee — Paid into state treasury. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 8, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 60-0311; S.L. 1999, ch. 534, § 11; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-12.
Insolvency of hay buyer. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 6; 1999, ch. 534, § 12; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-13.
Appointment of commission. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-14.
Trust fund established. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 8; 1999, ch. 534, § 13; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-15.
Joinder of surety — Deposit of proceeds. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 9; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-16.
Notice to claimants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-17.
Remedy of claimants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 11; 1999, ch. 534, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-18.
Commission to marshall trust assets. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 12; 1999, ch. 534, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-19.
Power of commission to prosecute or compromise claims. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 13; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-20.
Money received by trustee — Deposited in Bank of North Dakota. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-21.
Report of trustee to court — Approval — Distribution. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 15; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.

60-03-22.
Filing fees and court costs — Expenses. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 743, § 16; repealed by 2017, ch. 418, § 1, effective March 3, 2017.